Florida, session 2026, SB768.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 491.019, Florida Statutes, is created to 12 read: 13 491.019âLicensure by endorsement; marriage and family 14 therapists.âThe board shall issue a license to practice marriage 15 and family therapy to an applicant who meets all of the 16 following criteria: 17 (1)âSubmits a complete application. 18 (2)âSubmits the required application fee. 19 (3)âHolds an active, unencumbered marriage and family 20 therapy license in good standing issued by another state, the 21 District of Columbia, or a territory of the United States, and 22 provides proof of all mental health licenses held in any other 23 jurisdiction. 24 (4)âAttests that he or she is not, at the time of 25 submission of the application, the subject of a disciplinary 26 proceeding in a jurisdiction in which he or she holds a license 27 for reasons related to the practice of marriage and family 28 therapy. 29 (5)âHas not had disciplinary action taken against him or 30 her in the 5 years immediately preceding the date of submission 31 of the application. 32 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.